Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.04.010

Name of trust institution—Use of trust in name.

(1) A state trust company or out-of-state trust institution may register any name with the department in connection with establishing an office or otherwise engaged in trust business in Washington state pursuant to this title, except that the director may determine that a name proposed to be registered is potentially misleading to the public and require the registrant to select a name which is not potentially misleading.

(2) Use of "trust" as part of a person's name or fictitious trade name, or as part of a trademark or service mark in connection with transacting business with the public, or as part of advertising by any person to the public, is subject to the prohibitions and restrictions under RCW 30A.04.020.

[ 2019 c 389 s 3; 2014 c 37 s 303.]